Utah statutes.
63M-9-203.   Staffing.

The Department of Human Services, the Department of Health, the State Office of Education, and the Office of the Court Administrator shall provide staff for the state council and steering committee.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

